North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 6. Treasurer.

§ 147-65.
Salary of State Treasurer.

The salary of the State Treasurer shall be as established in the Current Operations Appropriations Act. In addition to the salary set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, longevity pay shall be paid on the same basis as is provided to employees of the State who are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

History.

Code, s. 3723; 1891, c. 505; Rev., s. 2739; 1907, c. 830, s. 3; c. 994, s. 2; 1917, c. 161; 1919, c. 233; c. 247, s. 3; C.S., s. 3868; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 49, s. 2; 1921, c. 11, s. 1; 1935, c. 249; 1941, c. 1; 1947, c. 1041; 1949, c. 1278; 1953, c. 1, s. 2; 1957, c. 1; 1963, c. 1178, s. 1; 1967, c. 1130; c. 1237, s. 1; 1969, c. 1214, s. 1; 1971, c. 912, s. 1; 1973, c. 778, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 16; 1977, c. 802, s. 42.9; 1983, c. 761, s. 215; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1987, c. 738, s. 32(b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Cross References.

As to settlement of affairs of inoperative boards and agencies, see

G.S. 143-267

et seq.

Commission to Study the Governance and the Adequacy of the Investment Authority of Various State-Owned Funds for the Purposes of Enhancing the Return on Investments.

Session Laws 2009-574, ss. 47.1 through 47.3, provide: “SECTION 47.1. There is established the Commission to Study the Governance and the Adequacy of the Investment Authority of Various State-Owned Funds for the Purposes of Enhancing the Return on Investments.

“SECTION 47.2.(a) The Commission shall be composed of 18 members as follows:

“(1) Five members of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

“(2) Five members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(3) The State Treasurer or her or his designee.

“(4) A representative from The University of North Carolina System.

“(5) A representative from the Community College System.

“(6) A representative from the Office of the State Controller.

“(7) A representative from the Office of State Budget and Management.

“(8) One member of the banking community, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

“(9) One member who is a certified public accountant, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(10) One member who is a certified financial advisor with investment expertise, appointed by the Governor.

“Vacancies on the Commission shall be filled by the appointing authority. The Commission shall be chaired by a Senator and a Representative designated by the appointing authority. A quorum of the Commission shall be 10 members.

“The Commission, while in the discharge of its official duties, may exercise all powers provided for under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

, including all the power to request all officers, agents, agencies, and departments of the State to provide any information, data, or documents within their possession, ascertainable from their records, or otherwise available to them.

“The Commission may meet at any time upon call of the chairs. The Commission may meet in the Legislative Building, the Legislative Office Building, the Offices of the State Treasurer, or any other location as agreed upon by the Commission. The Commission may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services as provided by

G.S. 120-32.02

.

“The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. The House of Representatives’ and Senate’s Directors of Legislative Assistants shall assign clerical staff to the Commission, and the expenses relating to the clerical employees shall be borne by the Commission. Members of the Commission shall receive subsistence and travel expenses at the rates set forth in

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate.

“SECTION 47.2.(b) The initial meeting of the Commission shall be called by the cochairs.

“SECTION 47.3. The Commission shall study issues relating to the source, nature, purpose, and distribution of various State funds. As part of its study, the Commission may examine issues related to:

“(1) The identification, documentation, and categorization of funds, including:

“a. The source of the funds.

“b. The current location and type of fund.

“c. Fund balances, including amounts needed to maintain adequate cash flow and amounts available for investments.

“d. Guiding documents.

“e. Governance structure.

“f. Current protections and investment authority.

“The Commission may consider any other issues it deems relevant to this study.”

Session Laws 2009-574, s. 47.4, as amended by Session Laws 2010-96, s. 37, and Session Laws 2010-152, s. 23, provides: “The Commission shall make an interim report to the 2010 Regular Session of the 2009 General Assembly prior to its convening, and shall make a final report to the 2011 Regular Session of the 2011 General Assembly. The report shall include any proposed legislation.”

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 2.2, provides: “The North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees is transferred to the Department of State Treasurer. This transfer shall have all the elements of a Type II transfer, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

§ 147-66.
Office and office hours.

The Treasurer shall keep his or her office at the City of Raleigh, and shall attend there between the hours of 10 o’clock A.M. and three o’clock P.M., Saturdays, Sundays, periods of travel, and legal holidays excepted. The Treasurer shall be allowed such office room as may be necessary.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, ss. 80, 81; Code, s. 3362; Rev., s. 5369; C.S., s. 7679; 2016-55, s. 1.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.1, effective January 31, 2017, inserted “or her”; and substituted “Saturdays, Sundays, periods of travel” for “Sunday,” and “The Treasurer” for “He.”

§ 147-67.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 884, s. 14.

§ 147-68.
To receive and disburse moneys; to make reports.

It is the duty of the Treasurer to receive all moneys which shall from time to time be paid into the treasury of this State; and to pay all warrants legally drawn on the Treasurer.

No moneys shall be paid out of the treasury except on warrant or pursuant to an electronic transfer initiated by the State, unless one of the following applies:

There is a legislative appropriation or authority to pay the same.

There is an electronic debit initiated by the federal government or by the government of another state to satisfy a bona fide financial obligation of the State.

It shall be the responsibility of the Treasurer to determine that all warrants presented to him for payment are valid and legally drawn on the Treasurer.

Recodified as

G.S. 147-69.12(c)

by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 4.1(b), effective July 1, 2016, and applicable to all reporting periods beginning on or after that date.

(d1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 4.1(d), effective July 1, 2016, and applicable to all reporting periods beginning on or after that date.

(d2)

Repealed by by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.12(a), effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to reports submitted on or after that date.

The State Treasurer, in carrying out the responsibilities of this section, shall be independent of any fiscal control exercise by the Director of the Budget or the Department of Administration and shall be responsible to the General Assembly and the people of North Carolina for the efficient and faithful exercise of the responsibilities of his office. The State Treasurer, for all other purposes, is subject to Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 71; Code, s. 3356; Rev., s. 5370; C.S., s. 7682; 1955, c. 577; 1957, c. 269, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 65; 1983, c. 913, s. 52; 2000-67, s. 24A; 2003-284, s. 28.2(a); 2004-129, s. 46A; 2006-203, s. 118; 2007-323, s. 13.2(b); 2016-55, ss. 4.1(b), (d); 2020-29, s. 5; 2021-180, s. 37.12(a).

Cross References.

As to funds of inoperative boards and agencies, see

G.S. 143-267

et seq.

As to Sexual Assault and Rape Crisis Center Fund, see

G.S. 143B-394.21

.

§ 147-68.1.
Banking operations.

The cost of administration, management, and operations of the banking operations of the Department of State Treasurer shall be apportioned equitably among the funds and programs using these services, and the costs so apportioned shall be deposited with the State Treasurer as a general fund nontax revenue. The cost of administration, management and operations of the banking operations of the Department of State Treasurer shall be covered by an appropriation to the State Treasurer for this purpose in the Current Operations Appropriations Act.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 118.

§ 147-68.2.
Confidentiality of warrants issued by the State.

Information contained in records held by the State about outstanding, unpaid warrants issued by the State are confidential and not available for public inspection to the extent that the Treasurer determines that information would be sufficient to counterfeit a warrant.

History.

2017-129, s. 6.

§ 147-69.
Deposits of State funds in banks and savings and loan associations regulated.

Banks and savings and loan associations having State deposits shall furnish to the Auditor of the State, upon the Auditor’s request, a statement of the moneys which have been received and paid by them on account of the treasury. The Treasurer shall keep in the Treasurer’s office a full account of all moneys deposited in and drawn from all banks and savings and loan associations in which the Treasurer may deposit or cause to be deposited any of the public funds, and these accounts shall be open to the inspection of the Auditor. The Treasurer shall sign all checks, and no depository bank or savings and loan association shall be authorized to pay checks not bearing the Treasurer’s official signature. The Treasurer is authorized to use a facsimile signature machine or device in affixing the Treasurer’s signature to warrants, checks or any other instrument the Treasurer is required by law to sign. The Commissioner of Banks, the bank examiners, and the savings and loan examiners, when so required by the State Treasurer, shall keep the State Treasurer fully informed at all times as to the condition of all these depository banks and savings and loan associations, so as to fully protect the State from loss. The State Treasurer shall, before making deposits in any bank or savings and loan association, require ample security from the bank or savings and loan association for these deposits.

History.

1905, c. 520; Rev., s. 5371; 1915, c. 168; 1917, c. 159; C.S., s. 7684; 1931, c. 127, s. 1; c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 175, s. 1; 1945, c. 644; 1949, c. 1183; 1967, c. 398, s. 2; 1977, c. 401, s. 1; 1983, c. 158, s. 4; 1987, c. 751, s. 1; 1989, c. 76, s. 27; 2001-193, s. 16; 2004-203, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-203, s. 11, effective August 17, 2004, made this section gender neutral; substituted “these accounts” for “such accounts” in the second sentence; substituted “Banks, the bank examiners, and the savings” for “Banks and bank examiners, and the Commissioner of Banks and the savings” in the fifth sentence; substituted “these depository” for “such depository” in the sixth sentence; and substituted “these deposits” for “such deposits” in the last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1949 amendment to this section, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 425 (1949).

§ 147-69.1.
Investments authorized for General Fund and Highway Funds assets.

The Governor and Council of State, with the advice and assistance of the State Treasurer, shall adopt such rules and regulations as shall be necessary and appropriate to implement the provisions of this section.

This section applies to funds held by the State Treasurer to the credit of:

The General Fund;

The Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund.

It shall be the duty of the State Treasurer to invest the cash of the funds enumerated in subsection (b) of this section in excess of the amount required to meet the current needs and demands on such funds, selecting from among the following:

Obligations of the United States or obligations fully guaranteed both as to principal and interest by the United States.

Obligations of the Federal Farm Credit Bank, the Federal Home Loan Banks, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, Fannie Mae, the Government National Mortgage Association, the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, the International Finance Corporation, the Inter-American Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, and the African Development Bank.

Repurchase Agreements with respect to one or more of the following:

Securities issued or guaranteed by the United States government or its agencies.

Securities eligible for investment by this section executed by a bank or trust company or by primary or other reporting dealers to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.

Securities eligible for investment by this section executed by a registered broker-dealer that is subject to the rules and regulations of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and is a member in good standing of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.

Obligations of the State of North Carolina.

Certificates of deposit and other deposit accounts of financial institutions under any of the following conditions:

With financial institutions with a physical presence in the State for the purpose of receiving commercial or retail deposits; provided that any principal amount of such deposit in excess of the amount insured by the federal government or any agency thereof, be fully secured by surety bonds, or be fully collateralized; provided further that the rate of return or investment yield may not be less than that available in the market on United States government or agency obligations of comparable maturity.

With financial institutions with a physical presence inside or outside the State, in accordance with all of the following conditions:

The funds are initially deposited through a bank or savings and loan association in the State that is an official depository and that is selected by the State Treasurer, provided that the rate of return or investment yield shall not be less than that available in the market on United States government or agency obligations of comparable maturity.

The selected bank or savings and loan association arranges for the redeposit of the funds in deposit accounts of the State in one or more federally insured banks or savings and loan associations wherever located, provided that no State funds shall be deposited in a bank or savings and loan association that at the time holds other deposits from the State.

The full amount of principal and any accrued interest of each deposit account are covered by federal deposit insurance.

The selected bank or savings and loan association acts as custodian for the State with respect to the deposit in the State’s account.

On the same date that the State funds are redeposited, the selected bank or savings and loan association receives an amount of federally insured deposits from customers of other financial institutions wherever located equal to or greater than the amount of the funds invested by the State through the selected bank or savings and loan association pursuant to this sub-subdivision.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 813, s. 10.

Prime quality commercial paper that, when acquired, bears the highest rating, such as a minimum of “P1,” “A1,” or “F1,” of at least one nationally recognized rating service designated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, and does not bear a rating below the highest by any nationally recognized rating service which rates the particular obligation.

Bills of exchange or time drafts drawn on and accepted by a commercial bank and eligible for use as collateral by member banks in borrowing from a federal reserve bank, provided that when bills or drafts are acquired, the accepting bank or its holding company is either (i) incorporated in the State of North Carolina or (ii) has outstanding publicly held obligations that bear the highest rating, such as a minimum of “P1,” “A1,” or “F1,” of at least one nationally recognized rating service designated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, and do not bear a rating below the highest by any nationally recognized rating service which rates the particular obligations.

Asset-backed securities (whether considered debt or equity) provided, when acquired, the securities bear the highest rating, such as “AAA” or “Aaa,” of at least one nationally recognized rating service designated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, and do not bear a rating below the highest rating by any nationally recognized rating service which rates the particular securities.

Corporate bonds and notes provided they, when acquired, bear the highest rating, such as “AAA” or “Aaa,” of at least one nationally recognized rating service designated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, and do not bear a rating below the highest by any nationally recognized rating service which rates the particular obligation.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the interest or income received and accruing from all deposits or investments of such cash balances shall be paid into the State’s General Fund, except that all interest or income received and accruing on the monthly balance of the Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund shall be paid into the State Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund. The cash balances of the several funds may be combined for deposit or investment purposes; and when such combined deposits or investments are made, the interest or income received and accruing from all deposits or investments shall be prorated among the funds in conformity with applicable law and the rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and Council of State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-55, s. 4.1(c), effective July 1, 2016, and applicable to all reporting periods beginning on or after that date.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 813, s. 10.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-444, s. 1, effective October 1, 2001.

History.

1943, c. 2; 1949, c. 213; 1957, c. 1401; 1961, c. 833, s. 2.2; 1967, c. 398, s. 1969, c. 125; 1975, c. 482; 1979, c. 467, s. 1; c. 717, s. 1; 1981, c. 801, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 313, s. 3; 1987, c. 751, ss. 2-4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 882, s. 5; 1989, c. 76, s. 28; c. 751, s. 7(43); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 813, s. 10; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 75; 1993, c. 105, s. 2; 1999-251, s. 1; 2001-444, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 14(m); 2005-394, s. 1; 2013-305, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 21.2(c); 2015-268, s. 7.5; 2016-55, ss. 1.2, 4.1(c).

Cross References.

See G.S. 124-5.1(a), directing the application of dividends of the North Carolina Railroad Company received by the State to reduce the obligations described in Session Laws 1997-443, s. 32.30(c), as amended by Session Laws 1999-237, s. 27.11(d). See also G.S. 124-5.1(b), regarding the cessation of accrual of interest on the remaining balance of the obligations described in Session Laws 1997-443, s. 32.20(c), as amended by Session Laws 1999-237, s. 27.11(d), effective January 1, 2000.